Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-223
Constitutional convention; delegates; vacancy; how filled.

If vacancies occur, the same shall be filled in the same manner as vacancies are filled for members of the Legislature.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 12, p. 552.